Hawaii statutes.
[§710-1016.6] Impersonating a law
enforcement officer in the first degree. (1) A person commits the offense
of impersonating a law enforcement officer in the first degree if, with intent
to deceive, the person pretends to be a law enforcement officer and is armed
with a firearm.

(2) Impersonating a law enforcement officer in
the first degree is a class C felony. [L 1987, c 130, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next